Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF81.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT NO. 99, ESKO; AMERICAN INDIAN MASCOT REMOVAL AND REPLACEMENT COSTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sum indicated in this section is appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal year designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Independent School District No. 99, Esko; American Indian mascot removal and replacement costs. new text end new text begin (a) For reimbursement to Independent School District No. 99, Esko, for American Indian mascot removal and replacement costs to comply with Minnesota Statutes, section 121A.041: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin 945,000 new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must reimburse the school district for the costs of removing and replacing an American Indian mascot on school facilities and equipment, including athletic uniforms, clocks, school signage, tribute markers, chairs, tables, entryway flooring, gymnasium flooring, athletic field artificial turf, and gymnasium wall mats. To be eligible for reimbursement, an expense must have been incurred by the school district on or after June 1, 2023. new text end new text begin (c) This appropriation is available until June 30, 2028. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end